Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4314
Calcium carbonate equivalent, defined.

Calcium carbonate equivalent shall mean the acid-neutralizing capacity of an agricultural liming material expressed as a weight percentage of calcium carbonate. The weight of water contained by the liming material shall be included when calculating the calcium carbonate equivalent.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 14.